Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-15,149
Conflict of interest; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 71-15,149 to 71-15,157:

(1) Housing agency official means any representative of a housing agency or any director, officer, or employee of a resident management corporation or other resident organization who exercises authority or carries out responsibilities in connection with the housing agency's developments or any local government official who exercises authority or carries out responsibilities in connection with the housing agency's developments, including any member of such person's immediate family, any business entity or organization in which such person holds an interest, and any business partner of such person; and

(2) Immediate family includes spouses, children, siblings, and parents and includes stepparents or stepchildren, in-laws, and half sisters or half brothers.

Laws 1999, LB 105, § 78.